Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 17

Marketing of Pecans

43-17-101. Purchasers of pecans for resale to keep records — Open to inspection — Exception.

Any person purchasing pecans for the purpose of resale or processing from anyone selling pecans shall keep a well-bound book, in which that person shall promptly enter in ink the name and place of residence of all persons from whom that person buys pecans, followed by the date of purchase, number of pounds bought, the amounts paid, and how the payment was made, whether in cash or by check, whether they were owned or raised, or purchased by the seller, and on whose land the pecan trees were located when gathered. The entries are to be made in chronological order from day to day as the business is transacted. This book shall at all times be open to inspection by the police or other officers, or any person who may desire to see it, and shall be in good faith kept and preserved by dealers for convenient inspection.

This chapter shall not apply to purchase of pecans by retail merchants from wholesale distributors for sale at retail.

Acts 1947, ch. 174, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.28 (Williams, § 5753.14); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1901.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7

Sale of cotton, title 43, ch. 18.

Soybean promotion, title ch. 20.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

Comparative Legislation. Marketing of pecans:

Ala. Code § 20-1-90 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 43-31-1 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-33-1 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
3.3, 3.4(1), 16.

43-17-102. Written permission of landowner to sell — When to be shown.

Any person offering pecans for sale that the person did not raise or own without purchasing, or on whose lands the pecans were not grown, shall be required by the buyer or dealer in the pecans, before such buyer or dealer buys them, to show a written permission to sell them from the party owning the land on which the pecans were grown, unless the party offering the pecans for sale is a bona fide owner of the land, and the dealer may require proper identification of the person offering pecans for sale.

Acts 1947, ch. 174, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.29 (Williams, § 5753.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1902.

43-17-103. Penalty for violations.

A violation of any of the provisions of § 43-17-101 or § 43-17-102 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1947, ch. 174, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.30 (Williams, § 5753.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1903; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-17-104. Special right of action in owner of pecans sold without consent.

In addition to the punishment provided in § 43-17-103, and either before or after, and with or without, criminal prosecution as provided for in § 43-17-103, the owner of any pecans that are sold by another without the owner's consent can maintain and recover of any person buying the pecans, who fails to comply with §§ 43-17-101 and 43-17-102, a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), to be recovered by a civil suit in any court having jurisdiction of the amount in this state. That amount is to be recovered by the owner of any pecans, sold to any person without the owner's consent, where the buyer does not keep and permit to be inspected the record of the purchase, as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1947, ch. 174, § 4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.31 (Williams, § 5753.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1904.

43-17-105. Tenant's possession or sale prima facie evidence of landlord's title — Burden of proof of transfer.

Possession and/or sale of pecans by any tenant of a landowner shall constitute prima facie evidence that such pecans are the property of such landowner and the burden of proof of transfer of ownership of the pecans shall rest with the tenant and/or purchaser from the tenant.

Any purchaser from a tenant or the immediate vendee of a tenant shall be liable to the landlord for the value of the pecans as in other cases of conversion, if the purchaser or vendee did not receive title.

Acts 1947, ch. 174, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.32 (Williams, § 5753.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1905.